en: Needlepoint frame canvas attachment method: Clamps; Grip strips; Hook-and-loop tape; Lacing; Magnetic; Sewn-on webbing; Snap-on tubes; Staples; Tacks or pins; Other
hr-HR: Metoda pričvršćivanja okvira platna za vezenje: Stezaljke; Ljepljive trake; Čičak-traka; Vezivanje; Magnetski; Ušivena traka; Cijevi na kopčanje; Spajalice; Čavlići ili pribadače; Ostalo
pl: Metoda mocowania kanwy do ramy needlepoint: Zaciski; Paski chwytne; Taśma rzepowa; Sznurowanie; Magnetyczne; Przyszywana taśma; Zatrzaskowe rurki; Zszywki; Pinezki lub szpilki; Inne
nl: Stramienraam stramienbevestigingsmethode: Klemmen; Gripstrips; Klittenband; Rijgen; Magnetisch; Opgestikt band; Opklikbare buizen; Nietjes; Punaises of spelden; Anders
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia plátna na rám na vyšívanie: Svorky; Upínacie pásy; Páska na suchý zips; Šnurovanie; Magnetické; Našitý popruh; Nacvakávacie trubice; Sponky; Pripináčiky alebo špendlíky; Iné
el: Μέθοδος στερέωσης καμβά σε πλαίσιο κεντήματος: Σφιγκτήρες; Αντιολισθητικές ταινίες; Ταινία χρατς; Δέσιμο με κορδόνι; Μαγνητική; Ραμμένος ιμάντας; Σωλήνες κουμπώματος; Συρραπτικά; Πινέζες ή καρφίτσες; Άλλο
ko: 니들포인트 프레임 캔버스 부착 방법: 클램프; 그립 스트립; 훅 앤 루프 테이프; 레이싱; 마그네틱; 봉제 웨빙; 스냅온 튜브; 스테이플; 압정 또는 핀; 기타
fr: Mode de fixation de la toile au cadre à tapisserie: Pinces; Bandes de préhension; Bande auto-agrippante; Laçage; Magnétique; Sangle cousue; Tubes encliquetables; Agrafes; Punaises ou épingles; Autre
th: วิธีการยึดผ้าใบ Frame ครอสติช: แคลมป์; แถบยึด; เทปตีนตุ๊กแก; การร้อยเชือก; แม่เหล็ก; สายรัดเย็บติด; ท่อแบบสวมกด; ลวดเย็บกระดาษ; หมุดหรือเข็มหมุด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Método de fixação da tela na moldura de bordado: Grampos; Fitas de aderência; Fita aderente; Atilho; Magnético; Cinta cosida; Tubos de encaixe; Agrafos; Tachas ou alfinetes; Outro
sv: Fästmetod för nålstickningsram: Klämmor; Grepplister; Kardborreband; Snörning; Magnetisk; Påsydd sadelgjord; Klämrör; Klamrar; Häftstift eller knappnålar; Övrigt
de: Befestigungsmethode der Needlepoint-Leinwand am Rahmen: Klemmen; Haftstreifen; Klettband; Schnürung; Magnetisch; Aufgenähtes Gurtband; Aufsteckrohre; Heftklammern; Reißzwecken oder Nadeln; Sonstiges
tr: Goblen çerçevesi kanvas sabitleme yöntemi: Kelepçeler; Tutucu şeritler; Cırt cırtlı bant; Bağlama; Manyetik; Dikili kolon bandı; Geçmeli tüpler; Zımbalar; Raptiye veya iğne; Diğer
es: Método de fijación del lienzo al bastidor de bordado: Abrazaderas; Tiras de agarre; Cinta autoadhesiva; Atado; Magnético; Cinta tejida cosida; Tubos a presión; Grapas; Tachuelas o alfileres; Otro
fi: Kirjontakehyksen kankaan kiinnitysmenetelmä: Puristimet; Tarraliuskat; Tarranauha; Nyöritys; Magneettinen; Kiinniommeltava nauha; Napsautettavat putket; Niitit; Nastat tai neulat; Muu
bg-BG: Метод за закрепване на платното към рамката за гоблен: Скоби; Захващащи ленти; Велкро лента; Шнур; Магнит; Пришита лента; Щракващи се тръби; Телчета; Кабърчета или карфици; Друго
sl-SI: Način pritrjevanja kanvasa na okvir za gobelin: Spenjače; Trakovi za oprijem; Trak z ježkom; Vezanje; Magnetno; Našit trak; Zaskočni tulci; Sponke; Risalni žebljički ali bucike; Drugo
cs: Způsob upevnění plátna ve vyšívacím rámu: Svorky; Upínací pásky; Páska se suchým zipem; Šněrování; Magnetické; Přišitý popruh; Nacvakávací trubičky; Sponky; Připínáčky nebo špendlíky; Ostatní
da: Metode til fastgørelse af stramaj på ramme: Klemmer; Gribestrimler; Burrebånd (velcro); Snøring; Magnetisk; Påsyet gjord; Snap on-rør; Hæfteklammer; Stifter eller nåle; Andet
pt-BR: Bastidor para tapeçaria método de fixação da tela: Grampos; Tiras de aderência; Fita de contato; Amarração; Magnético; Tecido costurado; Tubos de encaixe; Grampos de metal; Tachinhas ou alfinetes; Outro
lt-LT: Gobeleno rėmo drobės tvirtinimo metodas: Spaustukai; Kibi juosta; „Velcro“ juosta; Suvarstymas; Magnetinis; Prisiūta juosta; Užspaudžiami vamzdeliai; Kabės; Smeigtukai arba adatos; Kita
zh-TW: 針繡框畫布固定方式: 夾具; 防滑條; 魔鬼氈; 穿線綁緊; 磁吸式; 縫製織帶; 卡扣管; 訂書針; 圖釘或大頭針; 其他
hu: Gobelinkeret rögzítési módja: Szorítók; Tapadócsíkok; Tépőszalag; Fűzés; Mágneses; Felvarrt heveder; Pattintható csövek; Tűzőkapcsok; Rajzszögek vagy gombostűk; Egyéb
it: Metodo di fissaggio della tela al telaio per mezzo punto: Morsetti; Strisce antiscivolo; Nastro a strappo; Allacciatura; Magnetico; Fettuccia cucita; Tubi a incastro; Punti metallici; Puntine o spilli; Altro
nb: Festemetode for nålepunkt-rammelerret: Klemmer; Gripebånd; Borrelåsteip; Snøring; Magnetisk; Påsydd bånd; Rør som klikkes på; Stifter; Stifter eller nåler; Annet
ro-RO: Metoda de fixare a pânzei de goblen pe cadru: Cleme; Benzi de prindere; Bandă cu scai; Șnur; Magnetic; Chingă cusută; Tuburi cu prindere prin apăsare; Capse; Pioneze sau ace; Altele
ja: ニードルポイントFrameキャンバス取り付け方法: クランプ; グリップストリップ; 面ファスナーテープ; レーシング; マグネット; 縫い付けウェビング; スナップオンチューブ; ステープル; タックまたはピン; その他
ru: Способ крепления канвы к раме для гобеленовой вышивки: Зажимы; Крепежные ленты; Лента-липучка; Шнуровка; Магнитное; Пришивная тесьма; Защелкивающиеся трубки; Скобы; Кнопки или булавки; Другое
vi: Phương pháp gắn khung thêu kim mũi chỉ: Kẹp; Dải kẹp; Băng dán gai; Buộc dây; Nam châm; May vào đai viền; Ống bọc gài; Ghim bấm; Đinh ghim hoặc kim gài; Khác
zh-CN: 绒绣框架帆布固定方式: 夹钳; 抓力条; 魔术贴胶带; 系带; 磁性; 缝上织带; 扣接管; 订书钉; 图钉或别针; 其他